Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 44 Abandoned Property

34-44-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Abandoned Property Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1.

34-44-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Abandon” or “abandonment” means a situation where the owner of a building has intended to abandon the building and has manifested the intent with some act or failure to act. In determining whether an owner has abandoned his or her building, a court shall infer the intent of the owner from the existence of serious code violations that pose a health and/or safety hazard to the community and that have gone unrepaired for an unreasonable amount of time and from any of the surrounding facts and circumstances including, but not limited to the following:

Whether or not the building is vacant;

Whether or not the grounds are maintained;

Whether or not the building’s interior is sound;

Whether or not any vandalism on the building has gone unrepaired;

Whether or not rents have been collected from the building’s tenants by the owner;

The length of time any of the above conditions have existed.

“Abate” or “abatement” in connection with any property means the removal or correction of any hazardous conditions deemed to constitute a public nuisance and the making of such other improvements as are needed to affect a rehabilitation of the property that is consistent with maintaining safe and habitable conditions over the remaining useful life of the property. However, the closing or boarding up of any building that is found to be a public nuisance is not an abatement of the nuisance.

“Building” means any building or structure used for residential purposes or used for retail stores, shops, salesrooms, markets, or similar commercial uses, or for offices, banks, civic administration activities, professional services, or similar business or civic uses.

“Interested party” means any owner, mortgagee, lienholder, or other entity or person who or that possesses an interest of record in any property that becomes subject to the jurisdiction of the court pursuant to this chapter and any applicant for the appointment of a receiver pursuant to this chapter.

“Neighboring landowner” means any owner of property, including any entity or person who or that is purchasing property by land installment contract or under a duly executed purchase contract, that is located within two hundred feet (200´) of any property that becomes subject to the jurisdiction of the court pursuant to this chapter.

“Public nuisance” means a building that is a menace to the public health, welfare, or safety; or that is structurally unsafe, unsanitary; or not provided with adequate safe egress; or that constitutes a fire hazard; or is otherwise dangerous to human life; or is otherwise no longer fit and habitable; or that, in relation to existing use, constitutes a hazard to the public health, welfare, or safety by reason of inadequate maintenance, dilapidation, obsolescence, or abandonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 16.

34-44-3.
Injunctive relief and other relief.

In any proceeding, brought under chapter 27.3 of title 23 entitled the Rhode Island state building code, and any violation of the provisions of those regulations promulgated by the state building code standards committee entitled SBC-1 Rhode Island state building code, SBC-2 Rhode Island state one and two family dwelling code, SBC-3 Rhode Island state plumbing code, SBC-4 Rhode Island state mechanical code, SBC-5 Rhode Island state electrical code, SBC-6 state property maintenance code, SBC-19 state fuel gas code or any municipal ordinance or regulation concerning minimum housing standards, that is before a state court, municipal court, housing division of a state or municipal court, or in any proceeding upon a verified petition for abatement filed in the state court by the municipal corporation in which the property involved is located, by any neighboring landowner, or by a nonprofit corporation that is duly organized and has as one of its goals the improvement of housing conditions for low and moderate income persons in the municipality in which the property in question is located, if a building is alleged to be abandoned and either to be in a dangerous or unsafe condition or to be otherwise in violation of chapter 27.3 of title 23 entitled the Rhode Island state building code, and any violation of the provisions of those regulations promulgated by the state building code standards committee entitled SBC-1 Rhode Island state building code, SBC-2 Rhode Island state one and two family dwelling code, SBC-3 Rhode Island state plumbing code, SBC-4 Rhode Island state mechanical code, SBC-5 Rhode Island state electrical code, SBC-6 state property maintenance code, SBC-19 state fuel gas code or any municipal ordinance or regulation concerning building or housing, the municipal corporation, neighboring landowner, or nonprofit corporation may apply for an injunction requiring the owner of the building to correct the condition or to eliminate the violation. There shall be a hearing at least twenty (20) days after a summons for an injunction, indicating the date and time of the hearing is served upon the owner of the building. The summons shall be served by personal service, residence service, or service by certified mail pursuant to Rule 4 of the Superior Court Rules of Civil Procedure. If service cannot be made in one of these ways, the notice shall be served by posting it in a conspicuous place on the building and by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality in which the building is located. If the court finds at the hearing that the building is abandoned and either is in a dangerous or unsafe condition or is otherwise in violation of any ordinance or regulation concerning minimum housing standards, it shall issue an injunction requiring the owner to correct the condition or to eliminate the violation, or any other order that it considers necessary or appropriate to correct the condition or to eliminate the violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 485, § 1.

34-44-4.
Public nuisance determination — Show cause hearing — Appointment of receiver.

In any proceeding described in §

34-44-3

of this chapter, if the court makes the finding described in that section and additionally finds that the building in question constitutes a public nuisance and that the owner of the building has been afforded reasonable opportunity to begin correcting the dangerous or unsafe condition found or to begin eliminating the violation found and has refused or failed to do so, the court shall cause notice of its findings to be served upon the owner, each mortgagee or other lienholder of record, and any other interested party, and shall order the parties to show cause why a receiver should not be appointed to perform any work and to furnish any material that reasonably may be required to abate the public nuisance. The notice shall be served in the same manner as described in §

34-44-3

of this chapter.

Before appointing a receiver to perform any work to abate a public nuisance under this chapter, the court shall conduct a hearing at which any mortgagee of record or lienholder of record, or other interested party in the order of his or her priority of interest in title shall be offered the opportunity to undertake the work and to furnish the materials as are necessary to abate the public nuisance. The court shall require the party selected to demonstrate the ability promptly to undertake the work required, to provide the judge with a viable financial and construction plan for the rehabilitation of the building, and to post security for the performance of the work. All amounts expended by the party toward abating the public nuisance shall be a lien on the property if the expenditures were approved in advance by the court and if the party desires such a lien. The lien shall bear the interest, and shall be payable upon the terms approved by the court. The lien shall have the same priority as the mortgage of a receiver, as set forth in §

34-44-6

, if a certified copy of the court order that approved the expenses, the interest, and the terms of payment of the lien, and a description of the property in question are filed for record, within thirty (30) days of the date of issuance of the order, in the office of the recorder of deeds of the municipality in which the property is located. If the court determines at the hearing that no party can undertake the work and furnish the materials required to abate the public nuisance, or if the court determines at any time after the hearing that any party who is undertaking corrective work pursuant to this chapter cannot or will not proceed, or has not proceeded with due diligence, the judge may appoint a receiver to take possession and control of the property. The receiver shall be appointed in the manner provided in subsection (c).

No person shall be appointed a receiver unless he or she first has provided the court with a viable financial and construction plan for the rehabilitation of the property in question and has demonstrated the capacity and expertise to perform the required work in a satisfactory manner. Prior to the appointment of a receiver the court may grant access to the property in question to any person who applies to be appointed the receiver of the property, for the limited purpose of developing a viable financial and construction plan for the rehabilitation of the property which shall include the items set forth in §

34-44-4.1

. The appointed receiver may be a financial institution that possesses an interest of record in the property, a nonprofit corporation that is duly organized and has as one of its goals the improvement of housing conditions for low and moderate income persons in the municipality in which the property in question is located, or any other qualified property manager who certifies that any rehabilitation of the property in question will not result in the long term displacement of low and moderate income persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 254, § 1.

34-44-4.1.
Court determinations required.

Prior to ordering any work or the furnishing of any materials to abate a public nuisance under this chapter, the court shall review the submitted financial and construction plan and shall make all of the following findings:

The estimated cost of the labor, materials, and any other development costs required to abate the public nuisance;

The estimated income and expenses of the property after the furnishing of the materials and the completion of the repairs and improvements;

The need for conditions and availability of any financing that is necessary for the performance of the work and the furnishing of the materials;

If repair and rehabilitation of the building are not found to be feasible, the cost of demolition of the building, or the portions of the building that constitute the public nuisance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 254, § 1.

34-44-5.
Demolition.

Upon the written request of all of the interested parties to have the building, or portions of the building, demolished, because repair and rehabilitation of the building are found not to be feasible, the court may order the demolition. However, no demolition shall be ordered unless the requesting parties have paid the costs of demolition and of the receivership, and all notes, certificates, and mortgages of the receivership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 254, § 1.

34-44-6.
Receiver’s bond — Power and duties.

Before proceeding with his or her duties, any receiver appointed by the court shall post a bond in an amount designated by the court, but not exceeding the value of the building involved at the time of the appointment of the receiver as determined by the judge. The court may empower the receiver to do any or all of the following:

Take possession and control of the property, operate and manage the property, establish and collect rents and income, lease and rent the property, and evict tenants;

Pay all expenses of operating and conserving the property, including, but not limited to, the cost of electricity, gas, water, sewerage, heating fuel, repairs and supplies, custodian services, taxes and assessments, and insurance premiums, and hire and pay reasonable compensation to a managing agent;

Pay pre-receivership mortgages or installments of them and other liens;

Perform or enter into contracts for the performance of all work and the furnishing of materials necessary to abate, and obtain financing for the abatement of, the public nuisance;

Pursuant to court order, remove and dispose of any personal property abandoned, stored, or otherwise located on the property that creates a dangerous or unsafe condition or that constitutes a violation of housing regulations or ordinances;

Obtain mortgage insurance for the receiver’s mortgage from any agency of the federal government or private mortgage insurance company;

Enter into any agreement and do those things necessary to maintain and preserve the property and comply with all housing and building regulations and ordinances;

Give the custody of the property and the opportunity to abate the nuisance and operate the property to the owner, or any mortgagee or any lienholder of record;

Issue notes and secure them by a mortgage bearing interest upon terms and conditions as the court may approve. When sold or transferred by the receiver in return for valuable consideration in money, material, labor, or services, the notes or certificates shall be freely transferable. If within sixty (60) days of the issuance of a secured note, the mortgage is filed for record in the office of the municipal recorder of the municipality in which the property is located, it shall be a first lien upon the property and shall be superior to any claims of the receiver and to all prior or subsequent liens and encumbrances except taxes and assessments. Priority among the receiver’s mortgages shall be determined by the order in which they are recorded.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 254, § 1.

34-44-7.
Nonapplicability of monetary jurisdiction limits — Personal liability of receiver.

The amounts expended by the receiver, the amount of any notes issued by the receiver, any amounts expended by any other person authorized by the court under this chapter, any mortgage authorized by the court under this chapter and the amounts expended in connection with the foreclosure of any mortgage authorized by the court under this chapter shall not be limited by any monetary jurisdictional limit otherwise imposed upon the court that appoints the receiver. The receiver shall not be personally liable except for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in the performance of the function of his or her office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1.

34-44-8.
Expenses of receivership — Fees.

The court may assess as court costs, the costs and expenses set out in §

34-44-6

(2) of this chapter, and may approve receiver’s fees to the extent that they are not covered by the income from the property. Any expenses incurred by a receiver pursuant to the exercise of a receiver’s powers as set forth in §

34-44-6

shall be a lien on the proceeds of any fire insurance claim made by the owner of a building under the control of a receiver for damage or loss to the building caused by or arising out of any fire or explosion, where the event giving rise to the claim occurs on or after the date of appointment of a receiver; provided that the event giving rise to the claim was not caused by a receiver or a person or persons under the control of a receiver.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1.

34-44-9.
Discharge of a receiver.

The receiver may be discharged by the judge as provided in §

34-44-12

or at any time in the discretion of the court. The receiver shall be discharged when all of the following have occurred:

The public nuisance has been abated;

All costs, expenses, and approved fees of the receivership have been paid;

Either all receiver’s notes and mortgages issued pursuant to this section have been paid, or all the holder’s of the notes and mortgages request that the receiver be discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 254, § 1.

34-44-10.
Legality of prior and inferior mortgage liens.

The creation of any mortgage lien under this chapter prior to or superior to any mortgage of record at the time the mortgage lien was created shall not disqualify a prior recorded mortgage as a legal investment under chapter 9 of title 19.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1.

34-44-11.
Receiver’s entitlement to fees and commissions.

A receiver appointed under this section is entitled to receive fees and commissions in the same manner and to the same extent as receivers appointed in other court proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 447, § 1.

34-44-12.
Sale of building and property by receiver.

If a receiver appointed pursuant to §

34-44-4

files with the judge in the civil action described in §

34-44-4

a report indicating that the public nuisance has been abated, and if the judge confirms that the receiver has abated the public nuisance, and if the receiver or any interested party requests the judge to enter an order directing the receiver to sell the building and the property on which it is located, then the judge may enter that order after holding a hearing as described in subsection (b).

The receiver or interested party requesting an order as described in subsection (a) shall cause a notice of the date and time of a hearing on the request to be served on the owner of the building involved and all other interested parties in accordance with §

34-44-3

. The judge in the civil action described in §

34-44-3

shall conduct the scheduled hearing. At the hearing, if the owner or any interested party objects to the sale of the building and the property, the burden of proof shall be upon the objecting person to establish, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the benefits of not selling the building and the property outweigh the benefits of selling them. If the judge determines that there is no objecting person, or if he or she determines that there is one or more objecting persons but no objecting person has sustained the burden of proof specified herein, the judge may enter an order directing the receiver to offer the building and the property for sale upon terms and conditions that the judge shall specify, and may further order the removal of any clouds on the title to the building and property by reason of any liens or encumbrances that are inferior to any claims of the receiver, as provided by §

34-44-6(9)

, or if the receivership action is pending in a court other than the superior court, the judge may order the receiver to petition the superior court to order the removal of any clouds on the title to the building or property. An order by the superior court to remove any cloud on the title to the building and property shall be binding upon all those claiming by, through, under, or by virtue of, any inferior liens or encumbrances.

If a sale of a building and the property on which it is located is ordered pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) and if the sale occurs in accordance with the terms and conditions specified by the judge in his or her order of sale, then the receiver shall distribute the proceeds of the sale and the balance of any funds that the receiver may possess, after the payment of the costs of the sale, in the following order of priority and in the described manner:

First, the amount due for delinquent taxes and assessments owed to this state or a political subdivision of this state;

Second, in satisfaction of any mortgage liability incurred by the receiver pursuant to §

34-44-6

of this chapter, in their order of priority;

Third, any unreimbursed expenses and other amounts paid in accordance with §

34-44-6

of this chapter by the receiver, and the fees of the receiver assessed pursuant to §

34-44-8

of this chapter; and

Fourth, the amount of any pre-receivership mortgages, liens, or other encumbrances, in their order of priority.

Following a distribution in accordance with subsection (c), the receiver shall request the judge in the civil action described in §

34-44-3

to enter an order terminating the receivership. If the judge determines that the sale of the building and the property on which it is located occurred in accordance with the terms and conditions specified by the judge in his or her order of sale under subsection (b) and that the receiver distributed the proceeds of the sale and the balance of any funds that the receiver possessed, after the payment of the costs of the sale, in accordance with subsection (c), and if the judge approves any final accounting required of the receiver, the judge may terminate the receivership.

If a judge in a civil action described in §

34-44-3

enters a declaration that a public nuisance has been abated by a receiver, and if, within three (3) days after the entry of the declaration, all costs, expenses, and approved fees of the receivership have not been paid in full, the judge may enter an order directing the receiver to sell the building involved and the property on which it is located. The order shall be entered, and the sale shall occur, only in compliance with subsections (b) — (d).

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 254, § 2.